Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 3
EARLY CHILDHOOD SERVICES TRANSITION

26-6.2-301 to 26-6.2-306. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 870, § 134, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2021 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2022. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.